Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.035

Standard court forms—Rules—Administrative office of the courts to develop and establish—Failure to use or follow—Distribution.

(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop standard court forms and format rules for mandatory use by parties in dependency matters commenced under this chapter or chapter 26.44 RCW. Forms shall be developed not later than November 1, 2009, and the mandatory use requirement shall be effective January 1, 2010. The administrative office of the courts has continuing responsibility to develop and revise mandatory forms and format rules as appropriate.

(2) According to rules established by the administrative office of the courts, a party may delete unnecessary portions of the forms and may supplement the mandatory forms with additional material.

(3) Failure by a party to use the mandatory forms or follow the format rules shall not be a reason to dismiss a case, refuse a filing, or strike a pleading. The court may, however, require the party to submit a corrected pleading and may impose terms payable to the opposing party or payable to the court, or both.

(4) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a master copy of the mandatory forms to all county court clerks. Upon request, the administrative office of the courts and county clerks must distribute the forms to the public and may charge for the cost of production and distribution of the forms. Private vendors also may distribute the forms. Distribution of forms may be in printed or electronic form.

[ 2009 c 491 s 6.]